New Jersey, session 221, S497.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of the Municipal Land Use Law, P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, any of the default approval provisions contained in P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), including but not limited to section 35 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-47), section 36 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-48), section 38 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-50), section 48 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-61), section 60 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-73), and section 63 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-76), shall not apply to a municipal agency that is unable to grant or deny approval within the time period provided in P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.) under the following circumstances: a.     whenever there exists a public health emergency, declared by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency Health Powers Act, P.L.2005, c.222 (C.26:13-1 et seq.), or a state of emergency, declared by the Governor pursuant to P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A.9-33 et seq.), or both; and b.    for the 60 days immediately following the end of a public health emergency or a state of emergency, or, if both are declared, whichever emergency ends later. 2.    Notwithstanding the provisions of the Municipal Land Use Law, P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.), or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a municipal agency may choose to not hold regular meetings or hearings during the period of time the public health emergency, declared by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency Health Powers Act, P.L.2005, c.222 (C.26:13-1 et seq.), and the state of emergency, declared by the Governor pursuant to P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A.9-33 et seq.), under Executive Order No. 103 of 2020, are in effect. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall be retroactive to March 9, 2020.